Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-12,223
Qualified nonprofit organization; grant; requirements; repayment, when.

(1) Each qualified nonprofit organization that receives a grant under the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Act shall:

(a) Secure all of the private funds described in subdivision (1)(d) of section 81-12,222 through a written pledge or payment by December 31, 2021, and shall begin or resume construction on the organization's capital project by June 30, 2022; and

(b) Abide by the federal laws commonly known as the Davis-Bacon and Related Acts.

(2) Any qualified nonprofit organization that fails to meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall repay any grant funds received under the act.

Laws 2021, LB566, § 5.